Hawaii, session 2025, GM1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit
(2) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $1,069,797 $2,350,494
Special funds $341,845 $751,349
Federal funds $15,363 $33,789
Other funds $24,683 $54,590
Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the
department of education:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $563,460 $1,237,258
2025-3463 HB1028 CDl HMSO
oiiiHiiiiniiniiiHiiH

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Special funds $34 $75
Federal funds $1,316 $2,894
SECTION 2. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART II
SECTION 3. There are appropriated from the sources of
funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining unit (2):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $2,501 $5,532
SECTION 4. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART III
SECTION 5. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
2025-3463 HB1028 CDl HMSO
iniiHiBiiiiiHiiiiinii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
■. . I ’I . g
C.D. 1
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary
increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who
are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same
compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining unit (2);
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $3,640 $8,051
Revolving funds $3,953 $8,744
SECTION 6. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 7. There are authorized from the source of funding
indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation - corporate
office (HTH 210) the following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the collective
bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the
2025-3463 HB1028 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 1028
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (2) who
is assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Special funds $49,748 $109,875
SECTION 8, Funds authorized by this part shall be allotted
by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems
corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART V
SECTION 9. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining unit (2):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $319,294 $690,671
SECTION 10. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
2025-3463 HB1028 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO 1028
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PART VI
SECTION 11. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds.
SECTION 12. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, and
June 30, 2027, of the respective fiscal years, shall lapse as of
those dates.
SECTION 13. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3463 HB1028 CDl HMSO
liliiiHllliHH

1028
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 12th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1028, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1028, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
168